Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 10-1101 to 10-1106 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Governmental Unit Security Interest Act.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 17.